Illinois, session 104th, SB1317.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Section 11-60-3 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-60-3 new)7    Sec. 11-60-3. Sale of tobacco products or tobacco 8accessories near schools.9    (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law, nothing in this 10Division shall prohibit the issuance or renewal of a license 11authorizing the sale of tobacco products or tobacco 12accessories at a premises that is located within a 13municipality with a population in excess of 1,000,000 14inhabitants and is within 100 feet of the property line of any 15building or other location used primarily as a school if:16        (1) the school is a private elementary school;17        (2) the school is located within the boundaries of 18    West Devon Avenue, West Rosemont Avenue, North Mozart 19    Street, and North Fairfield Avenue; and20        (3) the sale of tobacco products or tobacco 21    accessories at the premises occurs only after school hours 22    until no later than 2 a.m.23    (b) A home rule municipality may not regulate the issuance   SB1317- 2 -LRB104 08972 RTM 19027 b1or renewal of a license authorizing the sale of tobacco 2products or tobacco accessories in a manner inconsistent with 3this Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection 4(i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on 5the concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and 6functions exercised by the State. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.